California statutes. Vehicle Code
 upon within 90 days of receipt by the department or the appropriate local agency, the access shall be deemed automatically approved. Thereafter, the route shall be deemed open for access by all other vehicles of the same type regardless of ownership. In lieu of processing an access application, the Department of Transportation or local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may provide signing, mapping, or a listing of highways as necessary to indicate the use of specific routes as terminal access routes. For purposes of this subdivision, “terminal” means either of the following:

(1) A facility where freight originates, terminates, or is handled in the transportation process.

(2) A facility where a motor carrier maintains operating facilities.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (c) or (d)
 authorizes state or local agencies to require permits of terminal operators or to charge terminal operators fees for the purpose of attaining access for vehicles described in this section.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the limitations of access specified in that subdivision do not apply to licensed carriers of household goods when directly en route to or from a point of loading or unloading of household goods, if travel on highways other than those specified in subdivision (a) is necessary and incidental to the shipment of the household goods.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 35400 and 35401, a combination of vehicles consisting solely of a truck tractor semitrailer combination with a kingpin to rearmost axle measurement limit of not more than 46 feet, a trailer length of not more than 56 feet, and used exclusively or primarily in connection with
 motorsports, may operate on the routes identified in subdivision (a) as well as on any other routes authorized for that purpose by the Department of Transportation in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, when issued a permit as set forth in paragraph (3). As used in this subdivision, “motorsports” means an event, and all activities leading up to that event, including, but not limited to, administration, testing, practice, promotion, and merchandising, that is sanctioned under the auspices of the member organizations of the Automobile Competition Committee for the United States.

(2) (A) The Department of Transportation shall conduct field tests of the truck tractor semitrailer combination authorized under paragraph (1) for motorsport trucks with a trailer length of not more than 56 feet to evaluate their performance on transition routes connecting to the Auto Club Speedway in Fontana.

(B) (i) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Transportation established the existing transition routes described in subparagraph (A) based on records from the 1990s.

(ii) The Department of Transportation shall update the transition routes to reflect road projects completed since the 1990s and shall update the transition routes every five years thereafter.

(iii) The Department of Transportation shall develop new transition routes, as necessary, for the truck tractor semitrailer combination authorized under paragraph (1) for motorsport trucks with a trailer length of not more than 56 feet.

(C) The Department of Transportation shall, no later than January 1, 2017, submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes the results of the field tests for the Auto Club Raceway in Pomona, the Sonoma Raceway, and the Auto Club Speedway in Fontana, an overview of the related roadway improvements identified and made, and, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a recommendation as to whether the maximum 56 foot trailer length should be reauthorized.

(D) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report under this paragraph is inoperative on January 1, 2019.

(3) Permits for a combination of vehicles consisting solely of a truck tractor semitrailer combination with a kingpin to rearmost axle measurement limit of not more than 46 feet, a trailer length of not more than 56 feet, for use exclusively or primarily in connection with motorsports, to operate on the routes
 identified in subdivision (a) as well as on any other routes authorized for that purpose, as provided in paragraph (1), shall be issued by the Department of Transportation, pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 35780) of Chapter 5. The permit requirement for travel on a specific route to or from the Auto Club Raceway in Pomona, the Sonoma Raceway, or the Auto Club Speedway in Fontana, shall apply only until field tests for each of those raceways by the Department of Transportation determine that no additional projects need to be performed on the specific route, or, if projects are required to be performed on the specific route, until those projects are completed.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) In authorizing the use of 53-foot semitrailers, it is the intent of the Legislature to conform with Section 31111(b)(1)(C) of Title 49 of the
 United States Code by permitting the continued use of semitrailers of the dimensions as those that were in actual and legal use on December 1, 1982, and does not intend this action to be a precedent for future increases in the parameters of any of those vehicles that would adversely affect the turning maneuverability of vehicle combinations.

(2) In authorizing the department to issue special transportation permits for motorsports, it is the intent of the Legislature to conform with Section 31111(b)(1)(F) of Title 49 of the United States Code. It is also the intent of the Legislature that this action not be a precedent for future increases in the distance from the kingpin to the rearmost axle of semitrailers and trailers that would adversely affect the turning maneuverability of vehicle combinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (SB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.7.

(a) The limitations of access specified in subdivision (d) of Section 35401.5 do not apply to licensed carriers of livestock when those carriers are directly en route to or from a point of loading or unloading of livestock on those portions of State Highway Route 101 located in the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, and Mendocino from its junction with State Highway Route 1 near Leggett north to the Oregon border, if the travel is necessary and incidental to the shipment of the livestock.

(b) The exemption allowed under this section does not apply unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The length of the truck tractor, in combination with the
 semitrailer used to transport the livestock, does not exceed a total of 70 feet.

(2) The distance from the kingpin to the rearmost axle of the semitrailer does not exceed 43 feet.

(3) The length of the semitrailer does not exceed a total of 48 feet.

(c) The exemption allowed under this section does not apply to travel conducted on the day prior to, or on the day of, any federally recognized holiday.

(d) (1) Because route improvements in Richardson Grove that will allow the combination of vehicles described in Section 35401.5 to fully operate on all portions of State Highway Route 101 located in the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, and Mendocino are ongoing and not yet completed, this section shall remain in effect only until both
 of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) All route improvements in Richardson Grove are completed without restraint, including, but not limited to, judicial or injunctive restraints.

(B) The Director of Transportation determines that the combination of vehicles described in Section 35401.5 is authorized to operate on all portions of State Highway Route 101 located in the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, and Mendocino. When the director makes the determination described in this subparagraph, the director shall post a declaration on the Internet Web site of the Department of Transportation.

(2) This section is repealed as of the date that the declaration described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) is posted on the Department of Transportation’s Internet Web site.

(3) The declaration described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall state that it is being made pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) If, prior to the completion of the route improvements in Richardson Grove as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the Director of Transportation determines that the only adjustment to State Highway Route 101 possible to accommodate the truck sizes allowed to travel on portions of State Highway Route 101, pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), is the removal of any tree that has a diameter of 42 inches or greater, measured outside the bark, at 12 inches above ground on the side adjacent to the highest ground level, the director shall notify the Secretary of State of that determination.

(2) If, prior to the completion of the route improvements in Richardson
 Grove as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the Director of Transportation determines that safety improvements to the portion of State Highway Route 101 described in subdivision (a) have resulted in the reclassification of the entire segment as a terminal access route pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35401.5, the director shall notify the Secretary of State of that determination.

(3) The notice required under paragraph (1) or (2) shall state that it is being made pursuant to this section.

(4) This section is repealed on the date the Secretary of State receives either of the notices described in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 542.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed on earlier of dates prescribed in subd. (d) and subd. (e).)
-------------------------------------------

35401.9.

Notwithstanding Section 35401, a driveaway-towaway combination, as described in Section 303, shall not exceed 97 feet in length when transporting up to three saddle-mounted vehicles and one full-mounted vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 25.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35402.

(a) Any extension or device, including any adjustable axle added to the front or rear of a vehicle, used to increase the carrying capacity of a vehicle shall be included in measuring the length of a vehicle, except that a drawbar shall not be included in measuring the length of a vehicle but shall be included in measuring the overall length of a combination of vehicles.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), extensions of not more than 18 inches in length on each end of a
 vehicle or combination of vehicles used exclusively to transport vehicles shall not be included in measuring the length of a vehicle or combination of vehicles when the vehicles are loaded.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an extension of not more than 18 inches in length on the last trailer in a combination of vehicles transporting loads shall not be included in measuring the length of a vehicle or combination of vehicles when the vehicles are loaded. Additionally, an extension of not more than 18 inches in length on the front of the first trailer in a combination of vehicles transporting loads shall not be included in measuring the length of a vehicle or combination of vehicles when the vehicles are loaded and on highways, other than those highways designated by the United States Department of Transportation as national network routes.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a),
 any extension or device which is not used to carry any load and which does not exceed three feet in length, added to the rear of a vehicle, and is used exclusively for pushing the vehicle or a combination of vehicles, which vehicle or combination of vehicles is designed and used exclusively to transport earth, sand, gravel, and similar materials, shall be included in measuring the length of the vehicle but shall not be included in measuring the overall length of the combination of vehicles.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a truck semitrailer combination, but not a truck tractor and semitrailer combination, may use a sliding fifth wheel, or a truck tractor, semitrailer, trailer, and a truck-trailer combination may use a sliding drawbar, to extend the length of the combination by not more than 2 feet 6 inches while traveling 35 miles per hour or less on any highway, except a freeway. These provisions shall apply, however, to freeway onramps
 and offramps and freeway connectors. The sliding fifth wheel or drawbar when extended shall not be included in measuring the overall length of the combination of vehicles if the pivot point of the semitrailer connection is more than two feet to the rear of the center of the rearmost axle of the motortruck or if the distance from the pivot point to the center of the rearmost axle of the semitrailer does not exceed 34 feet.

Combinations of vehicles permitted by this subdivision shall be in compliance with the weight limits provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 35550) of Chapter 5 whenever any drawbar or sliding fifth wheel is extended, contracted, or in any intermediate position as provided for by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 860, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35403.

Safety devices which are required to be mounted upon a vehicle pursuant to provisions of this code, may extend beyond the permissible length of a vehicle, or a combination of vehicles, to a distance not exceeding 10 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

35404.

Any county having a population in excess of 4,000,000 and having within its limits a natural island with an area in excess of 20,000 acres may, by ordinance, prohibit the use of any highway or lane, hereafter established in unincorporated area thereon, (1) by any vehicle exceeding an overall length of 170 inches and an overall width of 65 inches, or (2) by any such vehicle and all vehicles driven by internal combustion engines. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 906 of the Streets and Highways Code, no such ordinance shall be enacted unless the board of supervisors shall have theretofore adopted, by a four-fifths vote, a
 resolution determining that the public convenience and necessity require that such highway or lane have a width of 35 feet or less and a roadway width of 22 feet or less.

Any ordinance enacted pursuant to this section shall be subject to Sections 35718 to 35720, inclusive, of this code and shall not apply to authorized emergency vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

35405.

(a) An aerodynamic device that extends no more than five feet beyond the rear of a vehicle shall not be included in measuring the length of the vehicle or combination of vehicles, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The device does not have the strength, rigidity, or mass to damage a vehicle, or injure a passenger in a vehicle, that strikes the vehicle equipped with the device from the rear.

(2) The device does not obscure tail lamps, turn signals, marker lamps, identification lamps, or any other required safety devices, including, but not limited to, hazardous materials placards or conspicuity markings.

(b) For purposes of this section, “aerodynamic device” has the same meaning as defined in Section 35110.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 133, Sec. 2.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35406.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the load upon any vehicle operated alone, or the load upon the front vehicle of a combination of vehicles, shall not extend more than three feet beyond the foremost part of the front tires of the vehicle or the front bumper of the vehicle, if it is equipped with a front bumper.

(b) When the load is composed solely of vehicles, the load upon the front vehicle of a combination of vehicles shall not extend more than four feet beyond the foremost part of the front tires of the vehicle or the front bumper of the vehicle, if it is equipped with a front
 bumper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

35407.

Section 35406 does not apply to the booms or masts of shovels, cranes or water well drilling and servicing equipment carried upon a motor vehicle if the following conditions are met:

(a) The booms or masts shall not extend more than two-thirds of the wheelbase beyond the front tires of such vehicle.

(b) The projecting structure or attachments thereto shall be securely held in place to prevent dropping or swaying.

(c) No part of the structure which extends beyond the front tires
 shall be less than seven feet from the roadway.

(d) The driver’s vision shall not be impaired by the projecting or supporting structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

35407.5.

Section 35406 and subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 35407 do not apply to the booms or masts of a self-propelled heel-boom log loader first sold in this state prior to January 1, 1988, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) A system of mirrors or other view enhancements permits the driver to see in any area blocked from view.

(b) The log loader is operated together with a four wheeled lead vehicle which remains a reasonable distance ahead to guide the movement of the log loader.

(c) Two-way radio communication equipment is maintained in good working condition on the log loader and the pilot car, and is used between those vehicles during movement upon any highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35408.

In no event shall a front bumper on a motor vehicle be constructed or installed so as to project more than two feet forward of the foremost part of either the fenders or cab structure or radiator, whichever extends farthest toward the front of such vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35409.

(a) Any motor vehicle used for the purpose of taking photographs, motion pictures, or television pictures or for teaching safe driving may be equipped with a dismountable platform or other device extending forward of either the fenders or cab structure or radiator, whichever extends farthest toward the front of such vehicle, for a distance not exceeding five feet while such vehicle is in use for such purpose.

(b) Any device used for the sole purpose of teaching safe driving, as provided in subdivision (a), shall be of a type authorized by the Department of the California Highway Patrol
 and the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

35410.

The load upon any motor vehicle alone or an independent load only upon a trailer or semitrailer shall not extend to the rear beyond the last point of support for a greater distance than that equal to two-thirds of the length of the wheelbase of the vehicle carrying such load, except that the wheelbase of a semitrailer shall be considered as the distance between the rearmost axle of the towing vehicle and the rearmost axle of the semitrailer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35411.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the load upon any combination of vehicles shall not exceed 75 feet measured from the front extremity of the front vehicle or load to the rear extremity of the last vehicle or load.

(b) The load upon any combination of vehicles operating pursuant to Section 35401 or 35401.5, when the overall length of the combination of vehicles exceeds 75 feet, shall be confined within the exterior dimensions of the vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 145, Sec. 17.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35414.

(a) Except where a load can be transported consistent with the limitations on vehicle and load length specified in other sections of this chapter, the limitations of this chapter as to length of vehicles do not apply when only poles, timbers, pipes, integral structural materials, or single unit component parts, including, but not limited to, missile components, aircraft assemblies, drilling equipment, and tanks not exceeding 80 feet in length are being transported upon any of the following:

(1) Upon a pole or pipe dolly or otherwise lawful trailer used as a pole or pipe dolly in connection with a motor vehicle.

(2) Upon a semitrailer, except for the limitations provided in Section 35410. 

(3) Upon a semitrailer and a pole or pipe dolly used in connection with a truck tractor to haul flexible integral structural material.

(b) Poles and the tools and materials incidental to the work to be performed may be transported on a pole or pipe dolly or otherwise lawful semitrailer used as a pole or pipe dolly, transporting not more than three poles not exceeding 80 feet in length and when used by public utility companies or local public agencies engaged in the business of supplying electricity or telephone service, by the Department of Transportation, or by a licensed contractor in the performance of
 work for a utility, the department, or a local public agency, when such transportation is between a storage yard and job location where such tools and materials are to be used, in which event the limitations of this chapter as to length of vehicles and loads shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Weight [35550. - 35796.]



  ARTICLE 1. Axle Limits [35550. - 35559.]

35550.

(a) The gross weight imposed upon the highway by the wheels on any one axle of a vehicle shall not exceed 20,000 pounds and the gross weight upon any one wheel, or wheels, supporting one end of an axle, and resting upon the roadway, shall not exceed 10,500 pounds.

(b) The gross weight limit provided for weight bearing upon any one wheel, or wheels, supporting one end of an axle shall not apply to vehicles the loads of which consist of livestock.

(c) The maximum wheel load is the lesser of the following:

(1) The load limit established by the tire manufacturer, as molded on at least one sidewall of the tire.

(2) A load of 620 pounds per lateral inch of tire width, as determined by the manufacturer’s rated tire width as molded on at least one sidewall of the tire for all axles except the steering axle, in which case paragraph (1) applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 82.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35551.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section or Section 35551.5, the total gross weight in pounds imposed on the highway by any group of two or more consecutive axles shall not exceed that given for the respective distance in the following table:Distance in feet between
the extremes of any group 
of 2 or more consecutiveaxles2 axles3 axles4 axles5 axles6 axles 4 34,00034,00034,00034,00034,000 5 34,00034,00034,00034,00034,000 6 34,00034,00034,00034,00034,000 7 34,00034,00034,00034,00034,000 8 34,00034,00034,00034,00034,000 939,00042,50042,50042,50042,50010 40,00043,50043,50043,50043,50011 40,00044,00044,00044,00044,00012 40,00045,00050,00050,00050,00013 40,00045,50050,50050,50050,50014 40,00046,50051,50051,50051,50015 40,00047,00052,00052,00052,00016 40,00048,00052,50052,50052,50017 40,00048,50053,50053,50053,50018 40,00049,50054,00054,00054,00019 40,00050,00054,50054,50054,50020 40,00051,00055,50055,50055,50021 40,00051,50056,00056,00056,00022 40,00052,50056,50056,50056,50023 40,00053,00057,50057,50057,50024 40,00054,00058,00058,00058,00025 40,00054,50058,50058,50058,50026 40,00055,50059,50059,50059,50027 40,00056,00060,00060,00060,00028 40,00057,00060,50060,50060,50029 40,00057,50061,50061,50061,50030 40,00058,50062,00062,00062,00031 40,00059,00062,50062,50062,50032 40,00060,00063,50063,50063,50033 40,00060,00064,00064,00064,00034 40,00060,00064,50064,50064,50035 40,00060,00065,50065,50065,50036 40,00060,00066,00066,00066,00037 40,00060,00066,50066,50066,50038 40,00060,00067,50067,50067,50039 40,00060,00068,00068,00068,00040 40,00060,00068,50070,00070,00041 40,00060,00069,50072,00072,00042 40,00060,00070,00073,28073,28043 40,00060,00070,50073,28073,28044 40,00060,00071,50073,28073,28045 40,00060,00072,00076,00080,00046 40,00060,00072,50076,50080,00047 40,00060,00073,50077,50080,00048 40,00060,00074,00078,00080,00049 40,00060,00074,50078,50080,00050 40,00060,00075,50079,00080,00051 40,00060,00076,00080,00080,00052 40,00060,00076,50080,00080,00053 40,00060,00077,50080,00080,00054 40,00060,00078,00080,00080,00055 40,00060,00078,50080,00080,00056 40,00060,00079,50080,00080,00057 40,00060,00080,00080,00080,00058 40,00060,00080,00080,00080,00059 40,00060,00080,00080,00080,00060 40,00060,00080,00080,00080,000(b) In addition to the weights specified in subdivision (a), two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross weight of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more. The gross weight of each set of tandem axles shall not exceed
 34,000 pounds and the gross weight of the two consecutive sets of tandem axles shall not exceed 68,000 pounds.

(c) The distance between axles shall be measured to the nearest whole foot. When a fraction is exactly six inches, the next larger whole foot shall be used.

(d) This section does not affect the right to prohibit the use of any highway or any bridge or other structure thereon in the manner and to the extent specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 35700) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 35750) of this chapter.

(e) The gross weight limits expressed by this section and Section 35550 shall include all enforcement tolerances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   (AB 1953)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

35551.5.

(a) The provisions of this section shall apply only to combinations of vehicles which contain a trailer or semitrailer. Each vehicle in such combination of vehicles, and every such combination of vehicles, shall comply with either Section 35551 or with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of this section.

(b) The gross weight imposed upon the highway by the wheels on any one axle of a vehicle shall not exceed 18,000 pounds and the gross weight upon any one wheel, or wheels, supporting one end of an axle and resting upon the roadway, shall not exceed 9,500 pounds, except that
 the gross weight imposed upon the highway by the wheels on any front steering axle of a motor vehicle shall not exceed 12,500 pounds. The gross weight limit provided for weight bearing upon any one wheel, or wheels, supporting one end of an axle shall not apply to vehicles the loads of which consist of livestock. The following vehicles are exempt from the front axle weight limits specified in this subdivision:

(1) Trucks transporting vehicles.

(2) Trucks transporting livestock.

(3) Dump trucks.

(4) Cranes.

(5) Buses.

(6) Transit mix concrete or cement trucks, and trucks that mix concrete or cement at, or adjacent to, a
 jobsite.

(7) Motor vehicles that are not commercial vehicles.

(8) Vehicles operated by any public utility furnishing electricity, gas, water, or telephone service.

(9) Trucks or truck tractors with a front axle at least four feet to the rear of the foremost part of the truck or truck tractor, not including the front bumper.

(10) Trucks transporting garbage, rubbish, or refuse.

(11) Trucks equipped with a fifth wheel when towing a semitrailer.

(12) Tank trucks which have a cargo capacity of at least 1,500 gallons.

(13) Trucks transporting bulk grains or bulk
 livestock feed.

(c) The total gross weight with load imposed on the highway by any group of two or more consecutive axles of a vehicle in such combination of vehicles or of such combination of vehicles where the distance between the first and last axles of the two or more consecutive axles is 18 feet or less shall not exceed that given for the respective distance in the following table:Distance in feetAllowed load inbetween first
 andpounds on grouplast axles of groupof axles 4 32,000 5 32,000 6 32,200 7 32,900 8 33,600 9 34,30010 35,00011 35,70012 36,40013 37,1001443,20015 44,00016 44,80017 45,60018 46,400(d) The total gross weight with load imposed on the highway by any
 vehicle in such combination of vehicles or of such combination of vehicles where the distance between the first and last axles is more than 18 feet shall not exceed that given for the respective distances in the following table:DistanceAllowed loadin feetin pounds19 47,20020 48,00021 48,80022 49,60023 50,40024 51,20025 55,25026 56,10027 56,95028 57,80029 58,6503059,50031 60,35032 61,20033 62,05034 62,90035 63,75036 64,60037 65,45038 66,30039 68,00040 70,00041 72,00042 73,28043 73,28044 73,2804573,28046 73,28047 73,28048 73,28049 73,28050 73,28051 73,28052 73,60053 74,40054 75,20055 76,00056 or over 76,800(e) The distance between axles shall be measured to the
 nearest whole foot. When a fraction is exactly six inches, the next larger whole foot shall be used.

(f) The gross weight limits expressed by this section shall include all enforcement tolerances.

(g) Nothing in this section shall affect the right to prohibit the use of any highway or any bridge or other structure thereon in the manner and to the extent specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 35700) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 35750) of Chapter 5 of Division 15.

(h) The Legislature, in enacting this section, does not intend to increase, and this section shall not be construed to allow, statutory weights any greater than existed prior to January 1, 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 784, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

35552.

(a) This section applies only to trucks and vehicle combinations while transporting loads composed solely of logs.

(b) One set of tandem axles of such a truck or vehicle combination shall be deemed to be in compliance with Section 35551 if the total gross weight of 34,000 pounds on such a set that is permitted by Section 35551 is not exceeded by more than 1,500 pounds. In addition, such a truck and vehicle combination that has two consecutive sets of tandem axles shall be deemed to be in compliance with Section 35551 if such consecutive sets of tandem axles do not carry a combined total
 gross weight of more than 69,000 pounds, if the total gross weight on any one such set does not exceed 35,500 pounds, and if the overall distance between the first and last axle of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is 34 feet or more. All such truck and vehicle combinations shall be subject to all other provisions of Section 35551 or any other provision made applicable to the total gross weight of such a truck or vehicle combination in lieu of Section 35551.

(c) The gross weight limits expressed in this section shall include all enforcement tolerances.

(d) If any total gross weight permitted by this section is exceeded, the allowed weight in pounds set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 35551 shall be the maximum permitted weight for purposes of determining the amount of fine for such violation as specified in the table in Section 42030; except that, whenever the violation is
 for exceeding the total gross weight for two consecutive sets of tandem axles, and if the overall distance between the first and last axle of such sets is 34 feet or more, the allowed weight on the two consecutive sets shall be 68,000 pounds.

(e) This section shall have no application to highways which are a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways (as referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 108 of the Federal-aid Highway Act of 1956).

This section may be cited as the Christensen-Belotti Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 249.)
-------------------------------------------

35553.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any vehicle in the immediate vicinity of an unloading or loading area while actually preparing for or in the process of unloading or loading, provided any overload is incidental to and necessitated by such action; and provided that such action does not occur on a bridge or highway structure.

This section shall have no application to highways which are a part of the national system of interstate and defense highways (as referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 108 of the Federal-aid Highway Act of 1956).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

35554.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 35550, the maximum gross weight on any one axle of a bus shall not exceed 20,500 pounds.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued before January 1, 2016. This subdivision does not apply to a bus purchased during an option period in a multiyear contract to purchase transit buses that is entered into before January 1, 2016, by a publicly owned or operated transit system, or an operator of a transit system under contract with a publicly owned or operated transit system, provided, however, that the option
 period does not exceed five years from the date of the original contract, or extend beyond January 1, 2021, whichever is earlier.

(b) A transit bus is not subject to Section 35550.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the following provisions shall apply to a transit bus:

(1) The curb weight on any one axle of a transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued between January 1, 2016, and December 31,
 2018, inclusive, shall not exceed 23,000 pounds.

(2) The
 curb
 weight on any one axle of a transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued on or after January 1, 2019, shall not exceed 22,000 pounds.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (c), the following provisions shall apply to an articulated transit bus or zero-emission transit bus:

(1) The curb weight on any one axle of an articulated transit bus or zero-emission transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, shall not
 exceed 25,000 pounds.

(2) The curb weight on any one axle of an articulated transit bus or zero-emission transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued between January 1, 2018, and December 31, 2019, inclusive, shall not exceed 24,000 pounds.

(3) The curb weight on any one axle of an articulated transit bus or zero-emission transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued between January 1, 2020, and December 31, 2021, inclusive, shall not exceed 23,000 pounds.

(4) The curb weight on any one axle of an articulated transit bus or zero-emission transit bus procured through a solicitation process pursuant to which a solicitation was issued on or after January 1, 2022, shall not exceed 22,000 pounds.

(e) Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize
 a vehicle described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or described in subdivision (c) or (d) to be operated in violation of Section 35753.

(f) A transit operator operating an articulated transit bus shall, by July 1, 2016, provide notice to all cities and counties in whose jurisdiction the bus will operate in the upcoming calendar year, identifying the approximate routes upon which the bus is expected to be scheduled for service, including the names of streets and roads upon
 which that service is likely to take place. Thereafter, a transit operator operating an articulated transit bus shall annually provide notice by July 1, to all cities and counties in whose jurisdiction the bus will operate in the upcoming calendar
 year, identifying any changes to the service on those routes and any new routes upon which the bus is expected to be scheduled for the upcoming year. The notice shall include data from information provided by the bus manufacturer to the transit operator, identifying the weight of the articulated bus.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “curb weight” means the total weight of a fully loaded transit bus, including maximum fuel, oil, and coolant, and all equipment used in the normal operation of the bus, except without passengers or a driver.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, a transit bus shall not operate on the Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways in excess of the weight limitation for
 transit buses specified in federal law.

(i) If the gross weight imposed upon the highway by the wheels on any one axle of a transit bus exceeds 20,000 pounds, the axle shall be supported by four wheels bearing load upon the highway.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 263, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (AB 1250)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35555.

(a) During the period commencing September 15 of each year and ending March 15 of the following year, the weight limitations of Section 35551 do not apply to any cotton module mover or any truck tractor pulling a semitrailer that is a cotton module mover, when operated as follows:

(1) Laterally across a state highway at grade of the state highway.

(2) Upon any county highway within the Counties of Butte, Colusa,
 Fresno, Glenn, Imperial, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, Riverside, Sacramento, San Benito, San Bernardino, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Sutter, Tehama, Tulare, Yolo, and Yuba, except as prohibited or limited on county highways or portions thereof by resolution of the county board of supervisors having jurisdiction.

(b) A cotton module mover may be operated upon a state highway within the counties and during the period set forth in subdivision (a) if all of the following are met:

(1) The operator is in possession of a driver’s license of the class required for operation of the mover.

(2) The mover is operated in compliance with Sections 24002 and 24012; Article 1 (commencing with Section 24250) of, Article 3 (commencing with Section 24600) of, Article 4 (commencing with Section 24800) of, Article 5 (commencing with Section
 24950) of, Article 6 (commencing with 25100) of, Article 9 (commencing with 25350) of, Article 11 (commencing with 25450) of, Chapter 2 of Division 12; and Article 2 (commencing with 26450) and Article 3 (commencing with 26502) of Chapter 3 of Division 12.

(3) The mover does not exceed the maximum allowable gross axle weight for tandem axles set forth in Section 35551 by more than 6,000 pounds.

(4) The operator of a mover that exceeds the maximum allowable gross axle weight for tandem axle vehicles as set forth in Section 35551 shall possess a commercial driver’s license as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 15210.

(c) This section does not apply to those highways designated by the United States Department of Transportation as national network routes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35557.
